Washington statutes.
RCW 36.102.040

Public stadium authority advisory committee—Appointment—Review and comment on proposed lease agreement.

(1) There is created a public stadium authority advisory committee comprised of five members. The advisory committee consists of: The director of the office of financial management, who shall serve as chair; two members appointed by the house of representatives, one each appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and the minority leader of the house of representatives; and two members appointed by the senate, one each appointed by the majority leader of the senate and the minority leader of the senate.

(2) The advisory committee, prior to the final approval of any lease with the master tenant or sale of stadium naming rights, shall review and comment on the proposed lease agreement or sale of stadium naming rights.

[ 1997 c 220 s 104 (Referendum Bill No. 48, approved June 17, 1997).]